Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3214
Principles of law and equity.

The Uniform Commercial Code, consumer protection law, law governing deposits generally, law related to escheat and abandoned or unclaimed property, and the principles of law and equity, including law related to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, and bankruptcy, supplement the Uniform Special Deposits Act except to the extent inconsistent with the act.

Laws 2025, LB231, § 14.